Utah statutes.
63C-9-702.   Art Placement Subcommittee to the State Capitol Preservation Board -- Created -- Membership -- Operations.

(1) (a)  There is created an Art Placement Subcommittee to the State Capitol Preservation Board composed of 11 members appointed as provided in this Subsection (1).

(b) (i)  The governor shall appoint:

(A)  an architect, from a list of three architects submitted by the American Institute of Architects;

(B)  an artist, from a list of three artists submitted by the Utah Arts Council Board of Directors;

(C)  an historian, from a list of three historians submitted by the Board of State History; and

(D)  a citizen to represent the public at large who is not a member of the State Capitol Preservation Board.

(ii)  The governor, as chair of the board, with the concurrence of the board, shall appoint a member of the board as a voting member of the subcommittee.

(c)  The president of the Senate shall appoint three members, two from the majority party and one from the minority party.

(d)  The speaker of the House of Representatives shall appoint three members, two from the majority party and one from the minority party.

(2) (a) (i) (A)  Subcommittee members appointed by the governor shall serve four-year terms and may serve up to two consecutive terms.

(B)  The board member appointed by the governor under Subsection (1)(b)(ii) shall serve a two-year term, and may be reappointed.

(ii)  Subcommittee members appointed by the president of the Senate and the speaker of the House of Representatives shall serve two-year terms and may be reappointed.

(b)  In appointing members to the first subcommittee, the governor shall designate two members to serve a two-year term and two members to serve four-year terms.

(3) (a)  Each subcommittee member shall hold office until his successor has been appointed and qualified.

(b)  If a vacancy occurs in the subcommittee because of death, resignation, or otherwise, the appointing authority shall appoint a successor, who shall hold office for the unexpired term.

(c)  Six voting members of the subcommittee are a quorum for the purpose of organizing and conducting the business of the subcommittee.

(d)  The vote of a majority of members voting when a quorum is present is necessary for the subcommittee to take action.

(4) (a)  At the initial meeting of the subcommittee, the subcommittee shall select one of its number to serve as chair of the subcommittee.

(b)  The executive director of the board shall assist the subcommittee in their duties and shall provide staff services to the subcommittee.

(5)  A member may not receive compensation or benefits for the member's service, but may receive per diem and travel expenses in accordance with:

(a)  Section 63A-3-106;

(b)  Section 63A-3-107; and

(c)  rules made by the Division of Finance pursuant to Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.

(6)  The subcommittee shall meet at least quarterly.

